South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3741.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1140 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (15) taxable income received as the result of employment as an active-duty service member of the United States Armed Forces who is a resident of this State. For the purposes of this item, "active-duty" means full-time duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve on active-duty orders pursuant to U.S.C. Section 1209 and 1211. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to income tax years after 2024. ----XX----